Washington statutes.
RCW 15.51.030

Brassica seed production districts—Grower's petition—Rules.

Any grower or processor of a Brassica seed crop may submit a petition to the director requesting establishment of a Brassica seed production district. The petition must include proposed geographic boundaries of the district and the proposed types of regulations for designated Brassica seed crop species within the district. The petition must contain the signatures of at least ten growers or processors of affected Brassica seed crops grown within the boundaries of the proposed Brassica seed production district. If there are fewer than ten growers or processors of affected Brassica seed crops grown within the boundaries of the proposed district, then the applicant may submit a list of names and contact information for all Brassica seed crop growers and processors within the proposed district and a petition signed by at least fifty percent of these persons. In response to the petition, the director may adopt rules to establish Brassica seed production districts.

[ 2007 c 181 s 3.]